North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 3. Natural and Scenic Rivers System. [Repealed]

§ 113A-30.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.140 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-31.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.142 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-32.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.144 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-33.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.146 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-34.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.148 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-35.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.150 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-35.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.152 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-35.2.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.154 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-36.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.156 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-37.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.158 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-38.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.160 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-39.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.162 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-40.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.164 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-41.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.166 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-42.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.168 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-43.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.170 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-44.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.172 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§§ 113A-45 through 113A-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.